Nebraska, session 109, LB1260.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1260 LB1260
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 60-3,186, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
60-3,186 (1) The department shall annually determine the motor
vehicle tax on each motor vehicle registered pursuant to section 60-3,187
and shall cause a notice of the amount to be delivered to the registrant.
The notice may be delivered to the registrant at the address shown upon
his or her registration certificate or the registrant's most recent
address according to information received by the department from the
National Change of Address program of the United States Postal Service or
delivered electronically to the registrant if the registrant has provided
electronic contact information to the department. The notice shall be
provided on or before the first day of the last month of the registration
period.
(2)(a) The motor vehicle tax, motor vehicle fee, registration fee,
sales tax, and any other applicable taxes and fees shall be paid to the
county treasurer prior to the registration of the motor vehicle for the
following registration period. If the motor vehicle being registered has
been transferred as a gift or for a nominal amount, any sales tax owed by
the transferor on the purchase of the motor vehicle shall have been paid
or be paid to the county treasurer prior to the registration of the motor
vehicle for the following registration period.
(b)(i) The county treasurer shall retain the following percent of
the motor vehicle tax proceeds for costs incurred by such county
treasurer:
(A) For motor vehicle tax proceeds paid prior to July 1, 2028, one
percent; and
(B) For motor vehicle tax proceeds paid on or after July 1, 2028,
two percent.
(ii) The county treasurer shall transfer the following percent of
the motor vehicle tax proceeds to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Vehicle Title and Registration System Replacement and Maintenance Cash
-2-

LB1260 LB1260
2026 2026
Fund:
(A) For motor vehicle tax proceeds paid prior to July 1, 2028, one
percent; and
(B) For motor vehicle tax proceeds paid on or after July 1, 2028,
one and two-tenths of one percent.
(iii) The (b) After retaining one percent of the motor vehicle tax
proceeds collected for costs incurred by the county treasurer, and after
transferring one percent of the motor vehicle tax proceeds collected to
the State Treasurer for credit to the Vehicle Title and Registration
System Replacement and Maintenance Cash Fund, the remaining motor vehicle
tax proceeds that remain after deducting the percents specified in
subdivisions (b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection shall be allocated as
provided in subdivision (c) of this subsection to each county, local
school system, school district, city, and village in the tax district in
which the motor vehicle has situs.
(c) The remaining motor vehicle tax proceeds shall be allocated as
follows:
(i) For motor vehicle tax proceeds paid prior to July 1, 2028: (A)
(c)(i) Twenty-two percent of the remaining motor vehicle tax proceeds
shall be allocated to the county, (B) (ii) sixty percent shall be
allocated to the local school system or school district, and (C) (iii)
eighteen percent shall be allocated to the city or village, except that
(I) (A) if the tax district is not in a city or village, forty percent
shall be allocated to the county, and (II) (B) in counties containing a
city of the metropolitan class, eighteen percent shall be allocated to
the county and twenty-two percent shall be allocated to the city or
village.
(ii) For motor vehicle tax proceeds paid on or after July 1, 2028:
(A) If the tax district is in a city of the metropolitan class:
(I) Twenty-six percent to the county;
(II) Forty-eight percent to the local school system or school
-3-

LB1260 LB1260
2026 2026
district; and
(III) Twenty-six percent to the city of the metropolitan class;
(B) If the tax district is in a city other than a city of the
metropolitan class or in a village:
(I) Thirty-one and one-half of one percent to the county;
(II) Forty-eight percent to the local school system or school
district; and
(III) Twenty and one-half of one percent to the city or village; and
(C) If the tax district is not described in subdivision (c)(ii)(A)
or (B) of this subsection:
(I) Fifty-two percent to the county; and
(II) Forty-eight percent to the local school system or school
district.
(d) The amount allocated to a local school system shall be
distributed to school districts in the same manner as property taxes.
(3) Proceeds from the motor vehicle tax shall be treated as property
tax revenue for purposes of expenditure limitations, matching of state or
federal funds, and other purposes.
(4) Beginning in October 2028, on or before the twentieth day of
each January, April, July, and October, the department shall:
(a) Calculate the motor vehicle tax supplement that shall be paid to
each local school system or school district. Such supplement shall be
equal to forty and eight-tenths of one percent of the motor vehicle tax
allocated to such local school system or school district pursuant to this
section for the preceding three months; and
(b) Provide a report to the State Treasurer. Each such report shall
indicate the amount of the motor vehicle tax supplement to be paid to
each local school system or school district that is calculated under this
subsection.
(5) Within five business days after receiving a report under
subdivision (4)(b) of this section, the State Treasurer shall pay, to
-4-

LB1260 LB1260
2026 2026
each local school system or school district, the motor vehicle tax
supplements indicated in the report.
(6) Beginning with fiscal year 2028-29, it is the intent of the
Legislature to appropriate each fiscal year an amount sufficient to pay
the motor vehicle tax supplements calculated under this section.
Sec. 2. Section 60-3,187, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,187 (1) The motor vehicle tax schedules are set out in this
section.
(2) The motor vehicle tax shall be calculated by multiplying the
base tax times the fraction which corresponds to the age category of the
vehicle as shown in the following table:
YEAR FRACTION
First 1.00
Second 0.80
Second 0.90
Third 0.65
Third 0.80
Fourth 0.55
Fourth 0.70
Fifth 0.48
Fifth 0.60
Sixth 0.41
Sixth 0.51
Seventh 0.35
Seventh 0.42
Eighth 0.29
Eighth 0.33
Ninth 0.23
Ninth 0.24
-5-

LB1260 LB1260
2026 2026
Tenth 0.14
Eleventh 0.10
Tenth and Eleventh 0.15
Twelfth 0.06
Thirteenth 0.04
Twelfth and Thirteenth 0.07
Fourteenth and older 0.02
Fourteenth and older 0.00
(3) The base tax shall be:
(a) Automobiles, autocycles, and motorcycles — An amount determined
using the following table:
Value when new Base tax
Up to $3,999 $ 25
$4,000 to $5,999 35
$6,000 to $7,999 45
$8,000 to $9,999 60
$10,000 to $11,999 100
$12,000 to $13,999 140
$14,000 to $15,999 180
$16,000 to $17,999 220
$18,000 to $19,999 260
$20,000 to $21,999 300
$22,000 to $23,999 340
$24,000 to $25,999 380
$26,000 to $27,999 420
$28,000 to $29,999 460
$30,000 to $31,999 500
$32,000 to $33,999 540
$34,000 to $35,999 580
$36,000 to $37,999 620
-6-

LB1260 LB1260
2026 2026
$38,000 to $39,999 660
$40,000 to $41,999 700
$42,000 to $43,999 740
$44,000 to $45,999 780
$46,000 to $47,999 820
$48,000 to $49,999 860
$50,000 to $51,999 900
$52,000 to $53,999 940
$54,000 to $55,999 980
$56,000 to $57,999 1,020
$58,000 to $59,999 1,060
$60,000 to $61,999 1,100
$62,000 to $63,999 1,140
$64,000 to $65,999 1,180
$66,000 to $67,999 1,220
$68,000 to $69,999 1,260
$70,000 to $71,999 1,300
$72,000 to $73,999 1,340
$74,000 to $75,999 1,380
$76,000 to $77,999 1,420
$78,000 to $79,999 1,460
$80,000 to $81,999 1,500
$82,000 to $83,999 1,540
$84,000 to $85,999 1,580
$86,000 to $87,999 1,620
$88,000 to $89,999 1,660
$90,000 to $91,999 1,700
$92,000 to $93,999 1,740
$94,000 to $95,999 1,780
$96,000 to $97,999 1,820
-7-

LB1260 LB1260
2026 2026
$98,000 to $99,999 1,860
$100,000 to $101,999 1,900
$100,000 and over 1,900
$102,000 to $103,999 1,940
$104,000 to $105,999 1,980
$106,000 to $107,999 2,020
$108,000 to $109,999 2,060
$110,000 to $111,999 2,100
$112,000 to $113,999 2,140
$114,000 to $115,999 2,180
$116,000 to $117,999 2,220
$118,000 to $119,999 2,260
$120,000 to $121,999 2,300
$122,000 to $123,999 2,340
$124,000 to $125,999 2,380
$126,000 to $127,999 2,420
$128,000 to $129,999 2,460
$130,000 to $131,999 2,500
$132,000 to $133,999 2,540
$134,000 to $135,999 2,580
$136,000 to $137,999 2,620
$138,000 to $139,999 2,660
$140,000 to $141,999 2,700
$142,000 to $143,999 2,740
$144,000 to $145,999 2,780
$146,000 to $147,999 2,820
$148,000 to $149,999 2,860
$150,000 to $151,999 2,900
$152,000 to $153,999 2,940
$154,000 to $155,999 2,980
-8-

LB1260 LB1260
2026 2026
$156,000 to $157,999 3,020
$158,000 to $159,999 3,060
$160,000 to $161,999 3,100
$162,000 to $163,999 3,140
$164,000 to $165,999 3,180
$166,000 to $167,999 3,220
$168,000 to $169,999 3,260
$170,000 to $171,999 3,300
$172,000 to $173,999 3,340
$174,000 to $175,999 3,380
$176,000 to $177,999 3,420
$178,000 to $179,999 3,460
$180,000 to $181,999 3,500
$182,000 to $183,999 3,540
$184,000 to $185,999 3,580
$186,000 to $187,999 3,620
$188,000 to $189,999 3,660
$190,000 to $191,999 3,700
$192,000 to $193,999 3,740
$194,000 to $195,999 3,780
$196,000 to $197,999 3,820
$198,000 to $199,999 3,860
$200,000 and over 3,900
(b) Assembled automobiles — $60
(c) Assembled motorcycles other than autocycles — $25
(d) Cabin trailers, up to one thousand pounds — $10
(e) Cabin trailers, one thousand pounds and over and less than two
thousand pounds — $25
(f) Cabin trailers, two thousand pounds and over — $40
(g) Recreational vehicles, less than eight thousand pounds — $160
-9-

LB1260 LB1260
2026 2026
(h) Recreational vehicles, eight thousand pounds and over and less
than twelve thousand pounds — $410
(i) Recreational vehicles, twelve thousand pounds and over — $860
(j) Assembled recreational vehicles and buses shall follow the
schedules for body type and registered weight
(k) Trucks — Over seven tons and less than ten tons — $360
(l) Trucks — Ten tons and over and less than thirteen tons — $560
(m) Trucks — Thirteen tons and over and less than sixteen tons —
$760
(n) Trucks — Sixteen tons and over and less than twenty-five tons —
$960
(o) Trucks — Twenty-five tons and over — $1,160
(p) Buses — $360
(q) Trailers other than semitrailers — $10
(r) Semitrailers — $110
(s) Former military vehicles — $50
(t) Minitrucks — $50
(u) Low-speed vehicles — $50
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, truck means all
trucks and combinations of trucks except those trucks, trailers, or
combinations thereof registered under section 60-3,198, and the tax is
based on the gross vehicle weight rating as reported by the manufacturer.
(5) Current model year vehicles are designated as first-year motor
vehicles for purposes of the schedules.
(6) When a motor vehicle is registered which is newer than the
current model year by the manufacturer's designation, the motor vehicle
is subject to the initial motor vehicle tax in the first registration
period and ninety-five percent of the initial motor vehicle tax in the
second registration period.
(7) Assembled cabin trailers, assembled recreational vehicles, and
assembled buses shall be designated as sixth-year motor vehicles in their
-10-

LB1260 LB1260
2026 2026
first year of registration for purposes of the schedules.
(8) When a motor vehicle is registered which is required to have a
title branded as previous salvage pursuant to section 60-174, the motor
vehicle tax shall be reduced by twenty-five percent.
Sec. 3. Section 60-3,190, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,190 (1) A motor vehicle fee is imposed on all motor vehicles
registered for operation in this state. An owner of a motor vehicle which
is exempt from the imposition of a motor vehicle tax pursuant to section
60-3,185 shall also be exempt from the imposition of the motor vehicle
fee imposed pursuant to this section.
(2) The department shall annually determine the motor vehicle fee on
each motor vehicle registered pursuant to this section and shall cause a
notice of the amount to be delivered to the registrant. The notice shall
be combined with the notice of the motor vehicle tax required by section
60-3,186.
(3) The motor vehicle fee schedules are: set out in this subsection
and subsection (4) of this section. Except for automobiles with a value
when new of less than $20,000, and for assembled, reconstructed-
designated, and replica-designated automobiles, the fee shall be
calculated by multiplying the base fee times the fraction which
corresponds to the age category of the automobile as shown in the
following table:
YEAR FRACTION
First through fifth 1.00
Sixth through tenth .70
Eleventh and over .35
(4) The base fee shall be:
(a) Automobiles, with a value when new of less than $20,000, and
assembled, reconstructed-designated, and replica-designated automobiles —
$11 $5
-11-

LB1260 LB1260
2026 2026
(b) Automobiles, with a value when new of $20,000 through $39,999 —
$22 $20
(c) Automobiles, with a value when new of $40,000 or more — $33 $30
(d) Motorcycles and autocycles — $11 $10
(e) Recreational vehicles and cabin trailers — $33 $10
(f) Trucks over seven tons and buses — $33 $30
(g) Trailers other than semitrailers — $11 $10
(h) Semitrailers — $33 $30
(i) Former military vehicles — $11 $10
(j) Minitrucks — $11 $10
(k) Low-speed vehicles — $11 $10.
(4) (5) The motor vehicle tax, motor vehicle fee, and registration
fee shall be paid to the county treasurer prior to the registration of
the motor vehicle for the following registration period. After retaining
two one percent of the motor vehicle fee collected for costs, the
remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to
the Motor Vehicle Fee Fund. The State Treasurer shall return money funds
from the Motor Vehicle Fee Fund remitted by a county treasurer that is
which are needed for refunds or credits authorized by law.
(5)(a) (6)(a) The Motor Vehicle Fee Fund is created. On or before
the last day of each calendar quarter, the State Treasurer shall
distribute all money funds in the Motor Vehicle Fee Fund as follows: (i)
Seventy-four Fifty percent to the county treasurer of each county,
amounts in the same proportion as the most recent allocation received by
each county from the Highway Allocation Fund; and (ii) twenty-six fifty
percent to the treasurer of each municipality, amounts in the same
proportion as the most recent allocation received by each municipality
from the Highway Allocation Fund. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
-12-

LB1260 LB1260
2026 2026
(b) Money Funds from the Motor Vehicle Fee Fund shall be considered
local revenue available for matching state sources.
(c) All receipts by counties and municipalities from the Motor
Vehicle Fee Fund shall be used for road, bridge, and street purposes.
(6) (7) For purposes of subdivisions (3)(a) (4)(a), (b), (c), and
(f) of this section, automobiles or trucks includes all trucks and
combinations of trucks or truck-tractors, except those trucks, trailers,
or semitrailers registered under section 60-3,198, and the fee is based
on the gross vehicle weight rating as reported by the manufacturer.
(7) (8) Current model year vehicles are designated as first-year
motor vehicles for purposes of the schedules.
(8) (9) When a motor vehicle is registered which is newer than the
current model year by the manufacturer's designation, the motor vehicle
is subject to the initial motor vehicle fee for six registration periods.
(9) (10) Assembled vehicles other than assembled, reconstructed-
designated, or replica-designated automobiles shall follow the schedules
for the motor vehicle body type.
Sec. 4. Section 79-1018.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1018.01 Except as otherwise provided in this section, local
system formula resources include other actual receipts available for the
funding of general fund operating expenditures as determined by the
department for the second school fiscal year immediately preceding the
school fiscal year in which aid is to be paid. Other actual receipts
include:
(1) Public power district sales tax revenue;
(2) Fines, penalties, and license money distributed in accordance
with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska and license
fees;
(3) Tuition receipts from individuals, other districts, or any other
source except receipts derived from adult education, receipts derived
-13-

LB1260 LB1260
2026 2026
from summer school tuition, receipts derived from early childhood
education tuition, tuition receipts from converted contracts beginning
with the calculation of state aid to be distributed in school fiscal year
2011-12, and receipts from educational entities as defined in section
79-1201.01 for providing distance education courses through the
Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council to such educational
entities;
(4) Transportation receipts;
(5) Interest on investments;
(6) Other miscellaneous noncategorical local receipts, not including
receipts from private foundations, individuals, associations, or
charitable organizations;
(7) Special education receipts;
(8) Special education receipts and non-special-education receipts
from the state for wards of the court and wards of the state;
(9) All receipts from the temporary school fund. Receipts from the
temporary school fund shall only include (a) receipts pursuant to section
79-1035 and (b) the receipt of funds pursuant to section 79-1036 for
property leased for a public purpose as set forth in subdivision (1)(a)
of section 77-202;
(10) Motor vehicle tax and motor vehicle tax supplement receipts
received;
(11) Pro rata motor vehicle license fee receipts;
(12) Other miscellaneous state receipts excluding revenue from the
textbook loan program authorized by section 79-734;
(13) Impact aid entitlements for the school fiscal year which have
actually been received by the district to the extent allowed by federal
law;
(14) All other noncategorical federal receipts;
(15) Receipts under the federal Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act
of 1988, as such act existed on January 1, 2014, as authorized pursuant
-14-

LB1260 LB1260
2026 2026
to sections 43-2510 and 43-2511 for services to school-age children,
excluding amounts designated as reimbursement for costs associated with
the implementation and administration of the billing system pursuant to
section 43-2511;
(16) Receipts for accelerated or differentiated curriculum programs
pursuant to sections 79-1106 to 79-1108.03; and
(17) Revenue received from the nameplate capacity tax distributed
pursuant to section 77-6204.
Sec. 5. Original sections 60-3,186, 60-3,187, 60-3,190, and
79-1018.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-15-